Massachusetts, session 194th, H2156.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Definitions:
“Essential services,” any services that are required to promote the public health and
welfare of the Commonwealth as defined in the Governor's March 23, 2020 emergency order
(“COVID-19 Order No. 13”) or in the Governor's March 31, 2020 extension order (“COVID-19
Order No. 21”), regardless of whether these emergency orders have been rescinded, or as defined
in any other superseding emergency order or orders.
"Essential business," any private-sector employer that provides “Essential services” and
is authorized to remain open during a declaration by the Governor of a public health state of
of 3

emergency. This law shall apply to employers with eleven or more employees who are covered
by Section 148C of Chapter 149 of the General Laws.
"Essential worker" means an individual employed by an “Essential business.”
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding Chapter 149 of the General Laws or any other special or
general law to the contrary, following the declaration by the Governor of a public health state of
emergency that includes or is followed by any additional executive order in furtherance of such
declaration that includes an order to stay at home, shelter in place, or limit time spent outside the
home, any employer that provides “Essential Services” outside his or her home, shall pay each of
its essential workers, “hazard pay,” calculated at a rate not less than one and one-half times the
essential worker’s regular rate of pay for any hours worked while the public health state of
emergency is in effect. This section shall not apply to anyone employed by the Commonwealth
or any of its political subdivisions, or a bona fide executive, administrative, or professional
person exempt from overtime under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act.
SECTION 3. No essential worker shall be required to perform “Essential Services” work
under the following conditions: (1) if the worker reasonably believes that working in the
workplace would seriously threaten their health or safety; (2) if the worker has a health condition
that puts them at an elevated health risk arising from an immediate or imminent exposure to a
hazard; (3) if they live with a person whose health condition would put that person at an elevated
risk on the basis that working creates a health risk to that person; or (4) if they have to care for
children and daycare or schools are not available following the declaration by the Governor of a
public health state of emergency. A refusal to work shall not be grounds for discrimination,
dismissal, discharge, reduction in hours, or any other penalty. However, this section shall not
of 3

require an employer to provide pay during a period of refusal under this section, although this
section shall not impair an employee’s right to receive pay for any other reason.
SECTION 4. The provisions of this law shall be enforced by the office of the attorney
general pursuant to their authority under Section 150 of Chapter 149. However, an employee’s
right to receive all wages due under any other statute shall not be impaired by this statute, nor
shall an employee’s ability to enforce their rights under any other statute.
SECTION 5. Following the declaration by the Governor of a public health state of
emergency, that includes or is followed by any additional executive order in furtherance of such
declaration, any essential employer shall provide each of its essential workers, at no cost to them,
personal protective equipment related to the public health state of emergency and recommended
for the relevant work site or job task by the Department of Labor and Industry, the Department of
Health, the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or the Occupational Safety and
Health Administration.
of 3